Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Chapter 63

Distributions

48-63-101. Prohibited distributions.

Except as authorized by § 48-63-102, a corporation shall not make any distributions.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 13.01.

Cross-References. Application of nonprofit corporation law, title 48, chs. 51-67, to corporations existing on January 1, 1988, § 48-68-101.

Business corporations, shares and distributions, title 48, ch. 16.

Inapplicability of Nonprofit Corporation Act to certain rural electric and community services cooperatives, § 65-25-125.

48-63-102. Purchase of memberships—Authorized distributions.

A mutual benefit corporation may purchase its memberships if after the purchase is completed:

The corporation would be able to pay its debts as they become due in the usual course of its activities; and

The corporation's total assets would at least equal the sum of its total liabilities.

A public benefit corporation may make distributions to its members who are public benefit corporations if the distributions are in conformity with its charitable purposes.

A public benefit corporation and a mutual benefit corporation may make distributions upon dissolution in conformity with chapter 64 of this title.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 13.02; 2014, ch. 899, § 76.

Cross-References. Inapplicability of Nonprofit Corporation Act to certain rural electric and community services cooperatives, § 65-25-125.